Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB586.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 156.502 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Health services" means the provision of direct health care, including the
administration of medication; the operation, maintenance, or health care
through the use of medical equipment; or the administration of clinical
procedures. "Health services" does not include first aid or emergency
procedures;[ and]
(b) "Medication":
1. Means both prescription drugs and nonprescription drugs defined in
KRS 315.010; and
2. Does not include sunscreen;
(c) "School employee" means an employee of the public schools of this
Commonwealth; and
(d) "Sunscreen" means a product approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration for over-the-counter use for the purpose of limiting
ultraviolet light-induced skin damage.
(2) Health services shall be provided, within the health care professional's current
scope of practice, in a school setting by:
(a) A physician who is licensed under the provisions of KRS Chapter 311;
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, or licensed practical
nurse who is licensed under the provisions of KRS Chapter 314;
(c) A nonlicensed health technician that has the administration of health services
in his or her contract or job description as a job responsibility and who is
delegated responsibility to perform the health service by a physician,
advanced practice registered nurse, or registered nurse and has been trained
Page 1 of 7
BR131100.100 - 1311 - XXXX 3/3/2026 2:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1311
and approved in writing by the delegating physician or delegating nurse for
delegable health services; or
(d) A school employee who is delegated responsibility to perform the health
service by a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or registered nurse;
and
1. Has been trained by the delegating physician or delegating nurse for the
specific health service, if that health service is one that could be
delegated by the physician or nurse within his or her scope of practice;
and
2. Has been approved in writing by the delegating physician or delegating
nurse. The approval shall state that the school employee consents to
perform the health service when the employee does not have the
administration of health services in his or her contract or job description
as a job responsibility, possesses sufficient training and skills, and has
demonstrated competency to safely and effectively perform the health
service. The school employee shall acknowledge receipt of training by
signing the approval form. A copy of the approval form shall be
maintained in the student's record and the personnel file of the school
employee. A delegation to a school employee under this paragraph shall
be valid only for the current school year.
(3) If no school employee has been trained and delegated responsibility to perform a
health service, the school district shall make any necessary arrangement for the
provision of the health service to the student in order to prevent a loss of a health
service from affecting the student's attendance or program participation. The school
district shall continue with this arrangement until appropriate school personnel are
delegated the responsibility for health care in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) (a) Each local board of education shall adopt a policy authorizing:
Page 2 of 7
BR131100.100 - 1311 - XXXX 3/3/2026 2:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1311
1. A kindergarten to grade five (5) student to:
a. Possess sunscreen; and
b. Self-apply sunscreen with written permission of the parent or
guardian; and
2. A grade six (6) to twelve (12) student to:
a. Possess and self-apply sunscreen; and
b. May not require written permission of the parent or guardian;
and
(b) The local board of education policy shall cover the possession and use of
sunscreen when a student is:
1. In school;
2. Participating in a school-sponsored activity; and
3. In before-school, after-school, or summer care programs provided by
the school.
(5) A school employee who has been properly delegated responsibility for performing a
medical procedure under this section shall act as an agent of the school and be
granted liability protection under the Federal Paul P. Coverdell Teacher Liability
Protection Act of 2001, Pub. L. No. 107-110, unless the claimant establishes by
clear and convincing evidence that harm was proximately caused by an act or
omission of the school employee that constitutes negligence, willful or criminal
misconduct, or a conscious, flagrant indifference to the rights and safety of the
individual harmed.
(6)[(5)] Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny a student his or her right to
attend public school and to receive public school services, or to deny, prohibit, or
limit the administration of emergency first aid or emergency procedures.
Section 2. KRS 194A.380 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 194A.380 to 194A.383:
Page 3 of 7
BR131100.100 - 1311 - XXXX 3/3/2026 2:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1311
(1) "Criminal offense against a minor" means a conviction or a plea of guilty to any of
the following offenses if the victim is under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of
the commission of the offense:
(a) Kidnapping, as in KRS 509.040, except by a parent;
(b) Unlawful imprisonment, as in KRS 509.020, except by a parent;
(c) Sexual misconduct as in KRS 510.140;
(d) Use of a minor in a sexual performance, as in KRS 531.310;
(e) Promoting a sexual performance of a minor, as in KRS 531.320;
(f) Possession or viewing matter portraying a sexual performance by a minor, as
in KRS 531.335;
(g) Distribution of matter portraying a sexual performance by a minor, as in KRS
531.340;
(h) Promoting the sale of material portraying a sexual performance by a minor, as
in KRS 531.350;
(i) Advertising material portraying a sexual performance by a minor, as in KRS
531.360;
(j) Using minors to distribute material portraying a sexual performance by a
minor, as in KRS 531.370;
(k) Human trafficking involving commercial sexual activity, as in KRS 529.100;
(l) Promoting prostitution, as in KRS 529.040, when the defendant advances or
profits from the prostitution of a person under the age of eighteen (18);
(m) Unlawful transaction with a minor in the first degree, as in KRS
530.064(1)(a);
(n) Any attempt to commit any of the offenses described in paragraphs (a) to (m)
of this subsection; or
(o) Solicitation to commit any of the offenses described in paragraphs (a) to (m)
of this subsection;
Page 4 of 7
BR131100.100 - 1311 - XXXX 3/3/2026 2:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1311
(2) "Local government" means a city, county, consolidated local government, urban-
county government, unified local government, or charter county government;
(3) "Local government youth day camp" means a camp operated by a local government
for all or part of a day, whether free or for a fee, for five (5) or more children under
eighteen (18) years of age outside the presence of their parent or guardian for
recreational or educational purposes for four (4) or more consecutive hours per day
during school vacation periods, school breaks, or school cancellations;
(4) "Sex crime" means a conviction or a plea of guilty to any of the following offenses:
(a) Rape in the first degree as in KRS 510.040;
(b) Rape in the second degree as in KRS 510.050;
(c) Rape in the third degree as in KRS 510.060;
(d) Sodomy in the first degree as in KRS 510.070;
(e) Sodomy in the second degree as in KRS 510.080;
(f) Sodomy in the third degree as in KRS 510.090;
(g) Sodomy in the fourth degree as in KRS 510.100;
(h) Sexual abuse in the first degree as in KRS 510.110;
(i) Sexual abuse in the second degree as in KRS 510.120;
(j) Sexual abuse in the third degree as in KRS 510.130;
(k) Indecent exposure in the first degree as in KRS 510.148;
(l) Indecent exposure in the second degree as in KRS 510.150;
(m) Unlawful use of electronic means originating or received within the
Commonwealth to induce a minor to engage in sexual or other prohibited
activities as in KRS 510.155; or
(n) Incest as in KRS 530.020;
(5) "Staff member" means:
(a) An individual who is employed by a youth camp or camp or a local
government youth day camp for compensation;
Page 5 of 7
BR131100.100 - 1311 - XXXX 3/3/2026 2:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1311
(b) A contract employee or a self-employed individual whose employment
directly involves the care or supervision of children or unsupervised access to
children placed with a youth camp or camp or a local government youth day
camp; or
(c) A volunteer or intern whose activities on behalf of a youth camp or camp or a
local government youth day camp directly involves the care or supervision of
children or unsupervised access to children placed with a youth camp or camp
or a local government youth day camp;
(6) "Sunscreen" means a product approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for over-the-counter use for the purpose of limiting ultraviolet
light-induced skin damage. Sunscreen shall not be considered a prescription drug
or a nonprescription drug defined in KRS 315.010 and shall not require a
prescription or order for possession or self-application by a child;
(7) "Violent offender" means any person who has been convicted of or who has entered
a plea of guilty to the commission of a capital offense, Class A felony, Class B
felony involving the death of the victim or serious physical injury to the victim, or
rape in the first degree, or sodomy in the first degree; and
(8)[(7)] "Youth camp" or "camp" means:
(a) Any camp required pursuant to KRS 211.180 to obtain a permit to operate;
and
(b) Any program offered, whether free or for a fee, for recreational, educational,
sports training, or vacation purposes to children under eighteen (18) years of
age that a child attends outside the presence of his or her parent or legal
guardian.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 194A.380 TO 194A.383 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Each youth camp shall adopt a policy authorizing a child to carry and self-administer
Page 6 of 7
BR131100.100 - 1311 - XXXX 3/3/2026 2:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1311
child-provided or parent-provided sunscreen while attending such camp.
Page 7 of 7
BR131100.100 - 1311 - XXXX 3/3/2026 2:50 PM Jacketed